District of Columbia statutes.
4-203.03

Maintenance in public institution by Mayor.

No child 6 years of age or younger shall be maintained by the Mayor in any public institution except for medical treatment.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 303, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-203.3.